Massachusetts, session 194th, H2419.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, Boards of Health in cities and 
towns shall not have the power to ban the community-wide sale of legal tobacco products by 
authorized stores, establishments and any other entities legally allowed to sell tobacco in the 
Commonwealth and within the existing by-laws of the community, wholesale or retail, without 
receiving the approval of town meeting or city council to create such a by-law within the city or 
town.  This provision shall not interfere with a Board of Health’s ability to take action for an 
emergency and immediate health concern for a certain brand of the tobacco product or from a 
specific location if a health code violation has otherwise occurred or some other emergency 
health issue should arise so long as such action is not to ban the legal sale for the sake of doing 
so.